dictsource/mk_rules
// translation rules for Macedonian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.replace
//	Latn	Cyrl
	a	а
	b	б
	c	ц
	ć	ћ
	č	ч
	dž	џ
	dz	ѕ
	d	д
	đ	ђ
	e	е
	f	ф
	g	г
	h	х
	i	и
	j	ј
	k	к
	lj	љ
	l	л
	m	м
	nj	њ
	n	н
	o	о
	p	п
	r	р
	s	с
	š	ш
	t	т
	u	у
	v	в
	z	з
	ž	ж
	đ	ѓ
	ć	ќ

.group а
          а        a

.group б
          б        b

.group в
          в        v
          в (_     f


.group г
          г       g

.group д
          д       d

.group ѓ
          ѓ       dZ;

.group е
          е       e

.group ж
          ж       Z

.group з
          з       z

.group ѕ
          ѕ       dz

.group и
          и       i
       _) и       i_

.group ј
          ј       j

.group к
          к       k

.group л
          л       l

.group љ
          љ       l^

.group м
          м       m

.group н
          н       n

.group њ
          њ       n^

.group о
          о       o

.group п
          п       p

.group р
          р       R
       A) р (A    R
       K) р (A    @-*
          рр      R
          р (_    R
       C) р (C    'r

       K) р (K    'r-


.group с
          с       s
 
.group т
          т       t

.group ќ
          ќ       k^

.group у
          у       u

.group ф
          ф       f

.group х
          х       h

.group ц
          ц       ts

.group ч
          ч       tS;

.group џ
          џ       dZ

.group ш
          ш       S

.group a
        a        a
        a (j     A
        a (r     A        // don't reduce to [&]

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts

.group č
        č        tS

.group ć
        ć        tS;

.group d
        d        d
        dz       dz
        dž       dZ

.group đ
        đ        dZ;

.group e
        e        E
     j) e        e
        e (j     e
    ._) exe      %ekse        // filetype

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h
     _) h        x

.group i
        i        i
    ._) ini      %ini         // filetype

.group j
        j        j
    XA) j (_     j_      // short pause after final [j] in one-syllable words

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
     K) l (K     l-
        lj (+    l^

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N

        nj       n^

.group o
        o        o
        ou       oU

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k
        qu       kv

.group r
        r        R
     A) r (A     R
     K) r (A     @-*
        rr       R
        r (_     R

     K) r (K     'r-


.group s
        s        s

.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        v

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i


.group z
        z        z

.group ž
        ž        Z
                  
.group
        á        a:
        é        e:
        í        i:
        ó        o:
        ú        u:

        ä        _^_DE   // use German voice
        ö        _^_DE
        ü        _^_DE
        ß        _^_DE

        $        d'ol&R

        .        totSk&
        . (.     _:
   \.)  .

   __)  - (_D    minus
   A_)  - (_D    _
   C_)  - (_D    _
    --) -

        *        dzv'ezditSk&
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::

        =            'edn&kvo
        = (==
    =)  = (=
   ==)  = (_         _::

.group 0xce   // Greek letters

	α	'alf&
	ά	'alf&||t'onos
	β	b'et&
	γ	g'am&
	δ	d'elt&
	ε	'epsIlon
	έ	'epsIlon||t'onos
	ζ	z'et&
	η	'et&
	ή	'et&||t'onos
	θ	tx'et&
	ι	j'ot&
	ί	j'ot&||t'onos
	κ	k'ap&
	λ	l'amd&
	μ	m'i
	ν	n'i
	ξ	ks'i
	ο	'omIk@-*on_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

	π	p'i
	ρ	R'o
	σ	s'igm&
	ς	gr-tSko_||z'avr-Sno_||s'igm&
	τ	t'au
	υ	gr-tSki_||'ipsIlon
	ύ	gr-tSki||'ipsIlon||t'onos
	φ	f'i
	χ	x'i
	ψ	ps'i
	ω	'omeg&
	ώ	'omeg&||t'onos
	ό	'omIk@-*on||t'onos
